Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.070

Categories of appraisers.

There shall be two categories of state-certified real estate appraisers, one category of state-licensed real estate appraisers, and one category of state-registered appraiser trainee as follows:

(1) The state-certified general real estate appraiser;

(2) The state-certified residential real estate appraiser;

(3) The state-licensed real estate appraiser; and

(4) The state-registered appraiser trainee.

[ 2005 c 339 s 6; 1993 c 30 s 7; 1989 c 414 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2005 c 339: See note following RCW 18.140.005.